California statutes. Penal Code
(e) Any psychiatrist or psychologist appointed by the court may be called by either party to the action or by the court, and shall be subject to all legal objections as to competency and bias and as to qualifications as an expert. When called by the court or by either party to the action, the court may examine the psychiatrist or psychologist, as deemed necessary, but either party shall have the same right to object to the questions asked by the court and the evidence adduced as though the psychiatrist or psychologist were a witness for the adverse party. When the psychiatrist or psychologist is called and examined by the court, the parties may cross-examine him or her in the order directed by the court. When called by either party to the
 action, the adverse party may examine him or her the same as in the case of any other witness called by the party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   (SB 1281)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Transmission of Certain Indictments and Information [1029. - 1029.]

1029.

When an indictment is found or an information filed in the superior court against a judge thereof, a certificate of that fact must be transmitted by the clerk to the chairman of the Judicial Council, who shall thereupon designate and assign a judge of the superior court of another county to preside at the trial of such indictment or information, and hear and determine all pleas and motions affecting the defendant thereunder before and after judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 573.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Change of Venue [1033. - 1038.]

1033.

In a criminal action pending in the superior court, the court shall order a change of venue:

(a) On motion of the defendant, to another county when it appears that there is a reasonable likelihood that a fair and impartial trial cannot be had in the county. When a change of venue is ordered by the superior court, it shall be for the trial itself. All proceedings before trial shall occur in the county of original venue, except when it is evident that a particular proceeding must be heard by the judge who is to preside over the trial.

(b) On its own motion or on motion of any party, to an adjoining county when it appears as a result of the exhaustion of all of the jury panels called that it will be impossible to secure a jury to try the cause in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.1.

In any criminal action or proceeding in which the place of trial has been changed for any of the reasons set forth in Section 1033, the court, upon its own motion or upon the motion of any party, may return the action or proceeding to the original place of trial if both of the following conditions apply:

(a) The action or proceeding is pending before the court after reversal of the original judgment by the appellate court.

(b) The court finds that the conditions which originally required the order to change venue, as set forth in Section 1033, no longer apply. Prior to making such a finding, the court shall conduct a hearing, upon notice to all parties. At the hearing, the burden shall be on the prosecution to establish that the conditions which originally required the order to change venue no longer apply, unless the defendant and his or her attorney consent to the return of the action or proceeding to the original place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 837, Sec. 1.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.

A defendant arrested, held, or present in a county other than that in which an indictment, information, felony complaint, or felony probation violation is pending against the defendant, may state in writing his or her agreement to plead guilty or nolo contendere to some or all of the pending charges, to waive trial or hearing in the county in which the pleading is pending, and to consent to disposition of the case in the county in which that defendant was arrested, held, or present, subject to the approval of the district attorney for each county. Upon receipt of the defendant’s statement and of the written approval of the district attorneys, the clerk of the court in which the pleading is pending shall transmit the papers in the proceeding or certified copies thereof to the clerk of the court for the county in which the defendant is arrested, held, or present, and the prosecution shall continue in that county. However, the proceedings shall be limited solely to the purposes of plea and sentencing and not for trial. If, after the proceeding has been transferred pursuant to this section, the defendant pleads not guilty, the clerk shall return the papers to the court in which the prosecution was commenced and the proceeding shall be restored to the docket of that court. The defendant’s statement that the defendant wishes to plead guilty or nolo contendere may not be used against the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.

(a) Unless the court reserves jurisdiction to hear other pretrial motions, if a defendant is incarcerated and the court orders a change of venue to another county, the court shall direct the sheriff to deliver the defendant to the custody of the sheriff of the other county for the purpose of trial.

(b) If the defendant is incarcerated and the court orders that the jury be selected from the county to which the venue would otherwise have been transferred pursuant to Section 1036.7, the court shall direct the sheriff to deliver the defendant to the custody of the sheriff of that county for the purpose of jury selection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.5.

Following the resolution of pre-trial motions, and prior to the issuance of an order under Section 1036 or the transmittal of the case file for the purpose of trial to the court to which venue has been ordered transferred, the court may, upon its own motion or the motion of any party and on appropriate notice to the court to which venue has been transferred, set aside its order to change venue on the ground that the conditions which originally required the order to change venue, as set forth in Section 1033 or 1034, no longer apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 947, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.7.

When a change of venue is ordered and the court, upon motion to transfer a jury or on its own motion and upon unanimous consent of all defendants, determines that it would be in the interests of the administration of justice to move the jury rather than to move the pending action, a change of venue may be accomplished by the selection of a jury in the county or judicial district to which the venue would otherwise have been transferred, and the selected jury shall be moved to the court in which the criminal action is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 780, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.

(a) When a court orders a change of venue to a court in another county, all costs incurred by the receiving court or county, that are not payable pursuant to Section 4750, shall be paid by the transferring court or county as provided in Sections 1037.1 and 1037.2. Those costs may include, but are not limited to, the expenses for the following:

(1) The transfer, preparation, and trial of the action.

(2) The guarding, keeping, and transportation of the prisoner.

(3) Any appeal or other proceeding relating to the action.

(4) Execution of the sentence.

(b) The term “all costs” means all reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the receiving court or county as a result of the change of venue that would not have been incurred but for the change of venue. “All costs” does not include normal salaries, overhead, and other expenses that would have been incurred by the receiving court or county if it did not receive the trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.1.

(a) Change of venue costs, as defined in Section 1037, that are court operations, as defined in Section 77003 of the Government Code and Rule 10.810 of the California Rules of Court, shall be considered court costs to be charged against and paid by the transferring court to the receiving court.

(b) The Judicial Council shall adopt financial policies and procedures to ensure the timely payment of court costs pursuant to this section. The policies and procedures shall include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(1) The requirement that courts approve a budget and a timeline for reimbursement before the beginning of the trial.

(2) A process for the Administrative Office of the Courts to mediate any disputes regarding costs between transferring and receiving courts.

(c) (1) The presiding judge of the transferring court, or his or her designee, shall authorize the payment for the reimbursement of court costs out of the court operations fund of the transferring court.

(2) Payments for the reimbursement of court costs shall be deposited into the court operations fund of the receiving court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 192.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.2.

(a) Change of venue costs, as defined in Section 1037, that are incurred by the receiving county and not defined as court operations under Section 77003 of the Government Code or Rule 10.810 of the California Rules of Court shall be considered to be county costs to be paid by the transferring county to the receiving county. County costs include, but are not limited to, alterations, including all construction-related costs, to a courthouse made that only resulted from the transfer of the trial, rental of furniture or equipment that only resulted from the transfer of the trial, inmate transportation provided by the county sheriff from the jail to the courthouse, security of the inmate or other participants in the trial, unique or extraordinary costs for the extended storage and safekeeping of evidence related to the trial, rental of jury parking lot, jury parking lot security and related costs, security expenses incurred by the county sheriff or a contracted agency that resulted only from the transfer of the trial, and information services for the court, jury, public, or media.

(b) Transferring counties shall approve a budget and a timeline for the payment of county costs before the beginning of trial.

(c) Claims for the costs described in subdivision (a) shall be forwarded to the treasurer and auditor of the transferring county on a monthly basis. The treasurer shall pay the amount of county costs out of the general funds of the transferring county within 30 days of receiving the claim for costs from the receiving county.

(d) (1) The transferring court may, in its sound discretion, determine the reasonable and necessary costs under this section.

(2) The transferring court’s approval of costs shall become effective 10 days after the court has given written notice of the costs to the auditor of the transferring county.

(3) During the 10-day period specified in paragraph (2), the auditor of the transferring county may contest the costs approved by the transferring court.

(4) If the auditor of the transferring county fails to contest the costs within the 10-day period specified in paragraph (2), the transferring county shall be deemed to have waived the right to contest the imposition of these costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 193.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.

The Judicial Council shall adopt rules of practice and procedure for the change of venue in criminal actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. The Mode of Trial [1041. - 1045.]

1041.

An issue of fact arises:

1. Upon a plea of not guilty.

2. Upon a plea of a former conviction or acquittal of the same offense.

3. Upon a plea of once in jeopardy.

4. Upon a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

Issues of fact shall be tried in the manner provided in Article I, Section 16 of the Constitution of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 787, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.5.

Trial of an infraction shall be by the court, but when a defendant has been charged with an infraction and with a public offense for which there is a right to jury trial and a jury trial is not waived, the court may order that the offenses be tried together by jury or that they be tried separately with the infraction being tried by the court either in the same proceeding or a separate proceeding as may be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the defendant in a felony case shall be personally present at the trial.

(b) The absence of the defendant in a felony case after the trial has commenced in their physical presence shall not prevent continuing the trial to, and including, the return of the verdict in any of the following cases:

(1) Any case in which the defendant, after being warned by the judge that they will be removed if they continue their disruptive behavior, nevertheless insists on acting in a manner so disorderly, disruptive, and disrespectful of the court that the trial cannot be carried on with the defendant present in the courtroom.

(2) Any prosecution for an offense which is not punishable by death in which the defendant is voluntarily absent.

(c) Any defendant who is absent from a trial pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may reclaim the right to be present at the trial as soon as they are willing to act consistently with the decorum and respect inherent in the concept of courts and judicial proceedings.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not limit the right of a defendant to waive the right to be present in accordance with Section 977.

(e) If the defendant in a misdemeanor case fails to appear in person at the time set for trial or during the course of trial, the court shall proceed with the trial, unless good cause for a continuance exists, if the defendant has authorized
 their counsel to proceed in their absence pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 977.

If there is no authorization pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 977 and if the defendant fails to appear in person at the time set for trial or during the course of trial, the court, in its discretion, may do one or more of the following, as it deems appropriate:

(1) Continue the matter.

(2) Order bail forfeited or revoke release on the defendant’s own recognizance.

(3) Issue a bench warrant.

(4) (A) If the defendant is in custody, proceed with the trial in the defendant’s absence as authorized in subdivision (f).

(B) If the defendant is
 out of custody, proceed with the trial if the court finds the defendant has absented themselves voluntarily with full knowledge that the trial is to be held or is being held.

(f) (1) A trial shall be deemed to have commenced in the presence of the defendant for purposes of subdivision (b), or may proceed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e), if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:

(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that trial.

(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.

(C) The defendant has been informed that the trial will proceed without the defendant
 being present.

(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the trial.

(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.

(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.

(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.

(3) If the trial lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for
 each day that the defendant is absent.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to any trial in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of trial.

(g) Nothing herein shall limit the right of the court to order the defendant to be personally present at the trial for purposes of identification unless counsel stipulate to the issue of identity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 17.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the defendant in a preliminary hearing shall be personally present.

(b) The absence of the defendant in a preliminary hearing after the hearing has commenced in their physical presence shall not prevent continuing the hearing to, and including, holding to answer, filing an information, or discharging the defendant in any of the following cases:

(1) Any case in which the defendant, after being warned by the judge that they will be removed if they continued their disruptive behavior, nevertheless insists on acting in a manner so disorderly, disruptive, and disrespectful of the court that the hearing cannot be carried on with the defendant present in
 the courtroom.

(2) Any prosecution for an offense which is not punishable by death in which the defendant is voluntarily absent.

(c) Any defendant who is absent from a preliminary hearing pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may reclaim their right to be present at the hearing as soon as they are willing to act consistently with the decorum and respect inherent in the concept of courts and judicial proceedings.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not limit the right of a defendant to waive the right to be physically present or to appear through the use of remote technology in accordance with Section 977.

(e) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), a preliminary hearing shall be deemed to have commenced in the presence of the
 defendant if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:

(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that preliminary hearing.

(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.

(C) The defendant has been informed that the preliminary hearing will proceed without the defendant being present.

(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the preliminary hearing.

(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory
 right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.

(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.

(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.

(3) If the preliminary hearing lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to any preliminary hearing in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the preliminary hearing.

(f) This section shall remain in
 effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 51, Sec. 13) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 9.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 10 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the defendant in a preliminary hearing shall be personally present.

(b) The absence of the defendant in a preliminary hearing after the hearing has commenced in their physical presence shall not prevent continuing the hearing to, and including, holding to answer, filing an information, or discharging the defendant in any of the following cases:

(1) Any case in which the defendant, after being warned by the judge that they will be removed if they continued their disruptive behavior, nevertheless insists on acting in a manner so disorderly, disruptive, and disrespectful of the court that the hearing cannot be carried on with the defendant present in
 the courtroom.

(2) Any prosecution for an offense which is not punishable by death in which the defendant is voluntarily absent.

(c) Any defendant who is absent from a preliminary hearing pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may reclaim their right to be present at the hearing as soon as they are willing to act consistently with the decorum and respect inherent in the concept of courts and judicial proceedings.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not limit the right of a defendant to waive the right to be present in accordance with Section 977.

(e) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), a preliminary hearing shall be deemed to have commenced in the presence of the defendant if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence,
 all of the following to be true:

(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that preliminary hearing.

(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.

(C) The defendant has been informed that the preliminary hearing will proceed without the defendant being present.

(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the preliminary hearing.

(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on
 their own behalf.

(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.

(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.

(3) If the preliminary hearing lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to any preliminary hearing in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the preliminary hearing.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2032.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 51, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 10.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

It shall be the duty of the judge to control all proceedings during the trial, and to limit the introduction of evidence and the argument of counsel to relevant and material matters, with a view to the expeditious and effective ascertainment of the truth regarding the matters involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1927, Ch. 607.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

In any misdemeanor or infraction matter, where a verbatim record of the proceedings is not required to be made and where the right of a party to request a verbatim record is not provided for pursuant to any other provision of law or rule of court, if any party makes a request at least five days in advance and deposits the required fees, the court shall order that a verbatim record be made of all proceedings. Except as otherwise provided by law or rule the party requesting any reporting, recording, or transcript pursuant to this section shall pay the cost of such reporting, recording, or transcript.

This section shall cease to be operative upon a final decision of an appellate court holding that there is a constitutional right or other requirement that a verbatim record or transcript be provided at public expense for indigent or any other defendants in cases subject to the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1200, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Formation of the Trial Jury and theCalendar of Issues for Trial [1046. - 1051.]

1046.

Trial juries for criminal actions are formed in the same manner as trial juries in civil actions.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

(a) The issues on the calendar shall be disposed of in the following order, unless for good cause the court directs an action to be tried out of its order:

(1) Prosecutions for felony, when the defendant is in custody.

(2) Prosecutions for misdemeanor, when the defendant is in custody.

(3) Prosecutions for felony, when the defendant is on bail.

(4) Prosecutions for misdemeanor, when the defendant is on bail.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), all criminal actions in which (1) a minor is detained as a material
 witness or is the victim of the alleged offense, (2) a person who was 70 years of age or older at the time of the alleged offense or is a dependent adult, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 368, was a witness to, or is the victim of, the alleged offense or (3) any person is a victim of an alleged violation of Section 261, 264.1, 273a, 273d, 285, 286, 287, 288, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a, committed by the use of force, violence, or the threat thereof, shall be given precedence over all other criminal actions in the order of trial. In those actions, continuations shall be granted by the court only after a hearing and determination of the necessity thereof, and in any event, the trial shall be commenced within 30 days after arraignment, unless for good cause the court shall direct the action to be continued, after a hearing and determination of the necessity of the continuance, and states the findings for a determination of good cause on the record.

(c) This section does not provide a statutory right to a trial within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 40.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.1.

(a) In scheduling a trial date at an arraignment in superior court involving any of the following offenses, reasonable efforts shall be made to avoid setting that trial, when that case is assigned to a particular prosecuting attorney, on the same day that another case is set for trial involving the same prosecuting attorney:

 (1) Murder, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 187.

 (2) An alleged sexual assault offense, as described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 11165.1.

(3) An alleged child abuse offense, as described in Section 11165.6.

(4) A case being handled in the Career Criminal Prosecution Program pursuant to
 Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 999b).

(5) An alleged offense against a person with a developmental disability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “developmental disability” has the same meaning as found in Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (AB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1048, for good cause shown, the court may grant priority to an action for an alleged violation of Section 236.1 as the court, in its discretion, may determine to be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 644, Sec. 4.   (AB 2498)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1049.

After his plea, the defendant is entitled to at least five days to prepare for trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 606.)
-------------------------------------------

1049.5.

In felony cases, the court shall set a date for trial which is within 60 days of the defendant’s arraignment in the superior court unless, upon a showing of good cause as prescribed in Section 1050, the court lengthens the time. If the court, after a hearing as presecribed in Section 1050, finds that there is good cause to set the date for trial beyond the 60 days, it shall state on the record the facts proved that justify its finding. A statement of facts proved shall be entered in the minutes.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.

(a) The welfare of the people of the State of California requires that all proceedings in criminal cases shall be set for trial and heard and determined at the earliest possible time. To this end, the Legislature finds that the criminal courts are becoming increasingly congested with resulting adverse consequences to the welfare of the people and the defendant. Excessive continuances contribute substantially to this congestion and cause substantial hardship to victims and other witnesses. Continuances also lead to longer periods of presentence confinement for those defendants in custody and the concomitant overcrowding and increased expenses of local jails. It is therefore recognized that the people, the defendant, and the victims and other witnesses have the right to an expeditious disposition, and to that end it shall be the duty of all courts and judicial officers and of all counsel, both for the prosecution and the defense, to expedite these proceedings to the greatest degree that is consistent with the ends of justice. In accordance with this policy, criminal cases shall be given precedence over, and set for trial and heard without regard to the pendency of, any civil matters or proceedings. In further accordance with this policy, death penalty cases in which both the prosecution and the defense have informed the court that they are prepared to proceed to trial shall be given precedence over, and set for trial and heard without regard to the pendency of, other criminal cases and any civil matters or proceedings, unless the court finds in the interest of justice that it is not appropriate.

(b) To continue any hearing in a criminal proceeding, including the trial, (1) a written notice shall be filed and served on all parties to the proceeding at least two court days before the hearing sought to be continued, together with affidavits or declarations detailing specific facts showing that a continuance is necessary and (2) within two court days of learning that he or she has a conflict in the scheduling of any court hearing, including a trial, an attorney shall notify the calendar clerk of each court involved, in writing, indicating which hearing was set first. A party shall not be deemed to have been served within the meaning of this section until that party actually has received a copy of the documents to be served, unless the party, after receiving actual notice of the request for continuance, waives the right to have the documents served in a timely manner. Regardless of the proponent of the motion, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the people’s witnesses and the defense attorney shall notify the defense’s witnesses of the notice of motion, the date of the hearing, and the witnesses’ right to be heard by the court.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a party may make a motion for a continuance without complying with the requirements of that subdivision. However, unless the moving party shows good cause for the failure to comply with those requirements, the court may impose sanctions as provided in Section 1050.5.

(d) When a party makes a motion for a continuance without complying with the requirements of subdivision (b), the court shall hold a hearing on whether there is good cause for the failure to comply with those requirements. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall make a finding whether good cause has been shown and, if it finds that there is good cause, shall state on the record the facts proved that justify its finding. A statement of the finding and a statement of facts proved shall be entered in the minutes. If the moving party is unable to show good cause for the failure to give notice, the motion for continuance shall not be granted.

(e) Continuances shall be granted only upon a showing of good cause. Neither the convenience of the parties nor a stipulation of the parties is in and of itself good cause.

(f) At the conclusion of the motion for continuance, the court shall make a finding whether good cause has been shown and, if it finds that there is good cause, shall state on the record the facts proved that justify its finding. A statement of facts proved shall be entered in the minutes.

(g) (1) When deciding whether or not good cause for a continuance has been shown, the court shall consider the general convenience and prior commitments of all witnesses, including peace officers. Both the general convenience and prior commitments of each witness also shall be considered in selecting a continuance date if the motion is granted. The facts as to inconvenience or prior commitments may be offered by the witness or by a party to the case.

(2) For purposes of this section, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, those cases involving murder, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 187, allegations that stalking, as defined in Section 646.9, a violation of one or more of the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11165.1 or Section 11165.6, or domestic violence as defined in Section 13700, or a case being handled in the Career Criminal Prosecution Program pursuant to Sections 999b through 999h, or a hate crime, as defined in Title 11.6 (commencing with Section 422.6) of Part 1, has occurred and the prosecuting attorney assigned to the case has another trial, preliminary hearing, or motion to suppress in progress in that court or another court. A continuance under this paragraph shall be limited to a maximum of 10 additional court days.

(3) Only one continuance per case may be granted to the people under this subdivision for cases involving stalking, hate crimes, or cases handled under the Career Criminal Prosecution Program. Any continuance granted to the people in a case involving stalking or handled under the Career Criminal Prosecution Program shall be for the shortest time possible, not to exceed 10 court days.

(h) Upon a showing that the attorney of record at the time of the defendant’s first appearance in the superior court on an indictment or information is a Member of the Legislature of this state and that the Legislature is in session or that a legislative interim committee of which the attorney is a duly appointed member is meeting or is to meet within the next seven days, the defendant shall be entitled to a reasonable continuance not to exceed 30 days.

(i) A continuance shall be granted only for that period of time shown to be necessary by the evidence considered at the hearing on the motion. Whenever any continuance is granted, the court shall state on the record the facts proved that justify the length of the continuance, and those facts shall be entered in the minutes.

(j) Whenever it shall appear that any court may be required, because of the condition of its calendar, to dismiss an action pursuant to Section 1382, the court must immediately notify the Chair of the Judicial Council.

(k) This section shall not apply when the preliminary examination is set on a date less than 10 court days from the date of the defendant’s arraignment on the complaint, and the prosecution or the defendant moves to continue the preliminary examination to a date not more than 10 court days from the date of the defendant’s arraignment on the complaint.

(l) This section is directory only and does not mandate dismissal of an action by its terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.1.

In any case in which two or more defendants are jointly charged in the same complaint, indictment, or information, and the court or magistrate, for good cause shown, continues the arraignment, preliminary hearing, or trial of one or more defendants, the continuance shall, upon motion of the prosecuting attorney, constitute good cause to continue the remaining defendants’ cases so as to maintain joinder. The court or magistrate shall not cause jointly charged cases to be severed due to the unavailability or unpreparedness of one or more defendants unless it appears to the court or magistrate that it will be impossible for all defendants to be available and prepared within a reasonable period of time.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.5.

(a) When, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1050, the court imposes sanctions for failure to comply with the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 1050, the court may impose one or both of the following sanctions when the moving party is the prosecuting or defense attorney:

(1) A fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon counsel for the moving party.

(2) The filing of a report with an appropriate disciplinary committee.

(b) The authority to impose sanctions provided for by this section shall be in addition to any other authority or power available to the court, except that the court or magistrate shall not dismiss the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 133, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

Upon a trial for any offense, if a defense witness testifies, there shall be good cause for a reasonable continuance unless the court finds that the prosecutor was or should, with due diligence, have been aware of such evidence. If the continuance is granted because of the defendant’s testimony, it shall not exceed one day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Postponement of the Trial [1053. - 1053.]

1053.
